Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB336.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The title of the act of June 13, 1907 (P.L.560, No.373), entitled "An act designating the official flag of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania, and describing the same; providing for the carrying of such flag by the regiments of the National Guard of Pennsylvania; authorizing the Secretary of the Commonwealth to provide, and have deposited in the office of Secretary of the Commonwealth, a model of said flag, and making an appropriation therefor," is amended to read:AN ACT123456789101112131415161718192021 Designating the official flag of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania, and describing the same; providing for the carrying of such flag by the regiments of the National Guard of Pennsylvania; authorizing the Secretary of the Commonwealth to provide, and have deposited in the office of Secretary of the Commonwealth, a model of said flag, providing for the proper procedure to fold the flag, and making an appropriation therefor.Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 3.1. The following procedures constitute the proper way to fold the flag for presentation or display:(1) Fold the flag four times lengthwise so that one section displays the Commonwealth crest.(2) Fold each side behind the displayed section at a ninety-degree angle so that the display section forms a triangle.(3) Take the section ending with the hoist and fold it at a ninety-degree angle across the bottom of the display section and then fold the hoist back over so it is aligned with the middle of the display section.(4) Fold the other protruding section directly upwards so that its edge is flush with the display section and then fold it upwards along a forty-five-degree angle so that a mirror of the display section triangle is formed.(5) Fold the mirror section in half from the point upwards, then fold the remaining portion upwards, tucking it between the display section and the remainder of the flag.Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0336PN0291 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627